Maryland, session 2026, SB0232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–501.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0232*

SENATE BILL 232
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Certification agency” has the meaning stated in § 14–301 of this title.
(c) “Economically disadvantaged individual” has the meaning stated in § 14–301
of this title.
(d) “Small business” means:
(1) a certified minority business enterprise, as defined in § 14–301 of this
title, that meets the criteria specified under item [(3)] (4) of this subsection;
(2) a veteran–owned small business enterprise, as defined in § 14–601 of
this title, that meets the criteria specified under item [(3)] (4) of this subsection; [or]
(3) A HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESS, AS
DEFINED IN § 14–1101 OF THIS TITLE, THAT MEETS THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED UNDER
ITEM (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION; OR
[(3)] (4) a business, other than a broker, that meets the following criteria:
(i) the business is independently owned and operated;
(ii) the business is not a subsidiary of another business;
(iii) the business is not dominant in its field of operation; and
(iv) 1. A. the wholesale operations of the business did not
employ more than 50 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
B. the retail operations of the business did not employ more
than 25 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
C. the manufacturing operations of the business did not
employ more than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
D. the service operations of the business did not employ more
than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
E. the construction operations of the business did not employ
more than 50 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years; and
F. the architectural and engineering services of the business
did not employ more than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years; or

SENATE BILL 232 3
2. A. the gross sales of the wholesale operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $4,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years;
B. the gross sales of the retail operations of the business did
not exceed an average of $3,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
C. the gross sales of the manufacturing operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $2,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years;
D. the gross sales of the service operations of the business did
not exceed an average of $10,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
E. the gross sales of the construction operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $7,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years; and
F. the gross sales of the architectural and engineering
services of the business did not exceed an average of $4,500,000 in its most recently
completed 3 fiscal years.
(e) “Small business reserve” means those procurements that are limited to
responses from small businesses under § 14–502(c) of this subtitle.
SUBTITLE 11. HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESS
PARTICIPATION.
14–1101.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE
BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT:
(1) MEETS THE STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE U.S. SMALL BUSINESS
ADMINISTRATION IN 13 C.F.R. 126, SUBPART B AND ANY SUBSEQUENT REVISION
OF THAT REGULATION; AND
(2) MAINTAINS A PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS IN THE STATE THAT
IS IN A HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE.
14–1102.
(A) (1) A UNIT SHALL STRUCTURE PROCUREMENT PROCEDURES TO
MEET THE STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE U.S. SMALL BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION

SENATE BILL 232
IN SUBPART 19.13 OF THE FEDERAL ACQUISITION REGULATION, AS PROVIDED IN
48 C.F.R. CHAPTER 1.
(2) THE OVERALL PERCENTAGE GOAL OF THE UNIT’S TOTAL DOLLAR
VALUE OF PROCUREMENT CONTRACTS TO BE MADE DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY WITH
HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESSES IS:
(I) 1% IN 2026 AND 2027;
(II) 2% IN 2028; AND
(III) 3% IN 2029 AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER.
(3) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH, CONSISTENT
WITH SUBPART 19.13 OF THE FEDERAL ACQUISITION REGULATION, AS PROVIDED
IN 48 C.F.R. CHAPTER 1:
(I) A PROCESS FOR THE CERTIFICATION OF HISTORICALLY
UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESSES, INCLUDING THE VERIFICATION OF
ELIGIBILITY THROUGH THE FEDERAL SYSTEMS FOR AWARD MANAGEMENT; AND
(II) A PERCENTAGE PRICE PREFERENCE FOR PROCUREMENT
CONTRACTS MADE DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY WITH HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED
BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESSES.
(B) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE DO NOT APPLY TO A UNIT’S
PROCUREMENT PROCEDURES TO THE EXTENT THAT ANY UNIT DETERMINES THAT
THOSE PROVISIONS ARE IN CONFLICT WITH AN APPLICABLE FEDERAL PROGRAM.
14–1103.
THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS
AFFAIRS SHALL:
(1) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR TRACKING AND REPORTING
PARTICIPATION OF HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESSES
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, REPORT TO THE
LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE ON:

SENATE BILL 232 5
(I) THE NUMBER AND DOLLAR VALUE OF CONTRACTS
AWARDED TO HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESSES UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE TOTAL DOLLAR VALUE OF PAYMENTS MADE TO
HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESSES UNDER EXISTING
CONTRACTS; AND
(II) AN EVALUATION OF THE EFFECTIVENESS OF
PARTICIPATION AMONG HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE
BUSINESSES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
14–1104.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) KNOWINGLY AND WITH INTENT TO DEFRAUD, FRAUDULENTLY
OBTAIN OR ATTEMPT TO OBTAIN, OR AID ANOTHER PERSON IN FRAUDULENTLY
OBTAINING OR ATTEMPTING TO OBTAIN, PUBLIC MONEY, PROCUREMENT
CONTRACTS, OR FUNDS EXPENDED UNDER A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT TO WHICH
THE PERSON IS NOT ENTITLED UNDER THIS ARTICLE;
(2) KNOWINGLY AND WITH INTENT TO DEFRAUD, FRAUDULENTLY
REPRESENT PARTICIPATION OF A HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE
BUSINESS IN ORDER TO OBTAIN OR RETAIN A BID PREFERENCE OR A PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT;
(3) WILLFULLY AND KNOWINGLY MAKE OR SUBSCRIBE TO ANY
STATEMENT, DECLARATION, OR OTHER DOCUMENT THAT IS FRAUDULENT OR FALSE
AS TO ANY MATERIAL MATTER, WHETHER OR NOT THAT FALSITY OR FRAUD IS
COMMITTED WITH THE KNOWLEDGE OR CONSENT OF THE PERSON AUTHORIZED OR
REQUIRED TO PRESENT THE DECLARATION, STATEMENT, OR DOCUMENT;
(4) WILLFULLY AND KNOWINGLY AID, ASSIST IN, PROCURE, COUNSEL,
OR ADVISE THE PREPARATION OR PRESENTATION OF A DECLARATION, STATEMENT,
OR OTHER DOCUMENT THAT IS FRAUDULENT OR FALSE AS TO ANY MATERIAL
MATTER, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THAT FALSITY OR FRAUD IS COMMITTED WITH
THE KNOWLEDGE OR CONSENT OF THE PERSON AUTHORIZED OR REQUIRED TO
PRESENT THE DECLARATION, STATEMENT, OR DOCUMENT;
(5) WILLFULLY AND KNOWINGLY FAIL TO FILE ANY DECLARATION OR
NOTICE WITH THE UNIT THAT IS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE; OR

SENATE BILL 232
(6) ESTABLISH, KNOWINGLY AID IN THE ESTABLISHMENT OF, OR
EXERCISE CONTROL OVER A BUSINESS FOUND TO HAVE VIOLATED A PROVISION OF
ITEMS (1) THROUGH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR
BOTH.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTIES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A PERSON WHO VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IS:
(I) FOR THE FIRST OFFENSE, LIABLE FOR A CIVIL PENALTY OF
NOT LESS THAN $10,000 AND NOT EXCEEDING $30,000; AND
(II) FOR A SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, LIABLE FOR A CIVIL PENALTY
OF NOT LESS THAN $30,000 AND NOT EXCEEDING $50,000.
(3) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL PAY ALL COSTS AND ATTORNEY’S FEES INCURRED BY THE
PLAINTIFF IN A CIVIL ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL PROHIBIT A BUSINESS OR PERSON WHO FAILS TO
SATISFY THE PENALTIES, COSTS, AND ATTORNEY’S FEES IMPOSED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FROM FURTHER CONTRACTING WITH THE STATE
UNTIL THE PENALTIES ARE SATISFIED.
(D) (1) A UNIT SHALL REPORT ALL ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS
SECTION TO THE BOARD.
(2) THE BOARD SUBSEQUENTLY SHALL REPORT ALL ALLEGED
VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION TO THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, WHICH
SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER TO BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST A PERSON OR
BUSINESS FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
14–1105.
IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTIES UNDER § 14–1104(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A
PERSON THAT WILLFULLY MISREPRESENTS A BUSINESS AS A HISTORICALLY
UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESS ZONE BUSINESS FOR PURPOSES OF OBTAINING OR
RETAINING A CONTRACT OR SUBCONTRACT MAY BE SUBJECT TO:

SENATE BILL 232 7
(1) SUSPENSION OR DEBARMENT UNDER TITLE 16 OF THIS ARTICLE;
OR
(2) CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER THE MARYLAND FALSE CLAIMS ACT
UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.